District of Columbia statutes.
38-2673

Rules.

The Mayor, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2 [§ 2-501 et seq.], may issue rules to implement the provisions of this chapter. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 30-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, by resolution, within the 30-day period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 4034, 60 DCR 12472
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 4034 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) addition of this section, see § 4034 of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).
Section 4031 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle C of Title IV of the act may be cited as the “State Athletic Activities, Programs, and Office Fund Act of 2013”.